Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 38.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-4816
Certificate
of death; attestation required; statistical information.

(1) The physician responsible for the completion and signing of
the portion of the certificate of death entitled medical certificate of death
or, if there is no such physician, the person responsible for signing the
certificate of death shall attest on the death certificate whether organ or
tissue donation was considered and whether consent was granted under the protocol of the hospital.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall make
available the number of organ and tissue donors in Nebraska for statistical
purposes.

Laws 1987, LB 74, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 684;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 600;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 38.